South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-1-235.  (A) A law enforcement agency shall not purchase cell-site simulator technology from a company that requires the purchaser of the equipment to enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (B) As contained in this section, "cell-site simulator technology" means technology designed to intercept cell phone signals and capture text messages, emails, and other data. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----